src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!! !!!Meänkieli numerals 
! ############################## !

!! From fin via fkv.


!! !!!Numeral inflection
!! Numeral inflection is like nominal, except that numerals compound in all
!! forms which requires great amount of care in the inflection patterns.
! FIXME: compounding

! nominatives
LEXICON NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative back
!!€ kaksi: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom # two
!!€ kaks: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom
+Sg+Nom:0   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative front
!!€ yksi: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom # one
!!€ yks: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom # one
+Sg+Nom:0   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative plural back
!!€ kahđet: kaksi+Num+Pl+Nom
+Pl+Nom:%>t     NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative plural front
!!€ yhđet: yksi+Num+Pl+Nom
+Pl+Nom:%>t     NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

! basic cases
LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak singular back
!!€ kahđen: kaksi+Num+Sg+Gen
!!€ kahđela: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ kahđelta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Abl
!!€ kahđele: kaksi+Num+Sg+All
!!€ kahđessa: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ kahđesta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ela
!!€ kahđeksi: kaksi+Num+Sg+Tra
!!€ kahđetta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Abe
0    NUM_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
+Sg+Gen:%>n     NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
+Sg+Abe:%>tta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Abl:%>lta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>la   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+All:%>le   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+Ade+Err/Orth:%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+All+Err/Orth:%>lle   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ela:%>sta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ine:%>ssa   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Tra:%>kse   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL       ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L
+Sg+Ade:%>la   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>le   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_LL
+Sg+Ade:%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>lle   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak singular front
!!€ yhđen: yksi+Num+Sg+Gen
!!€ yhđelä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ade
!!€ yhđeltä: yksi+Num+Sg+Abl
!!€ yhđele: yksi+Num+Sg+All
!!€ yhđessä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ine
!!€ yhđestä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ela
!!€ yhđeksi: yksi+Num+Sg+Tra
!!€ yhđettä: yksi+Num+Sg+Abe
0    NUM_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
+Sg+Gen:%>n     NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT   ;
+Sg+Abe:%>ttä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Abl:%>ltä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>lä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+All:%>le   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+Ade+Err/Orth:%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Sg+All+Err/Orth:%>lle   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ela:%>stä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ine:%>ssä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Tra:%>kse   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL       ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_L
+Sg+Ade:%>lä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>le   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_LL
+Sg+Ade:%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>lle   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral strong singular back
!!€ kahtena: kaksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!+Sg+Ess:%>na NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Nom:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
+Sg+Gen:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
+Pl+Nom:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA
+Sg+Ess:%>na NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NNA
+Sg+Ess:%>nna NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral strong singular front
!!€ yhtenä: yksi+Num+Sg+Ess
!+Sg+Ess:%>nä NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Nom:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
+Sg+Gen:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
+Pl+Nom:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA
+Sg+Ess:%>nä NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NNA
+Sg+Ess:%>nnä NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural back
!!€ kaksila: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ade
!!€ kaksilta: kaksi+Num+Pl+Abl
!!€ kaksile: kaksi+Num+Pl+All
!!€ kaksissa: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ kaksista: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ela
!!€ kaksiksi: kaksi+Num+Pl+Tra
!!€ kaksitta: kaksi+Num+Pl+Abe
+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>i%>la   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+All:%>i%>le  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+Ade+Err/Orth:%>i%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+All+Err/Orth:%>i%>lle  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse  NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL        ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>la   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>le  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_LL
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>lle  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural front
!!€ yksilä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ade
!!€ yksiltä: yksi+Num+Pl+Abl
!!€ yksile: yksi+Num+Pl+All
!!€ yksissä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ine
!!€ yksistä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ela
!!€ yksiksi: yksi+Num+Pl+Tra
!!€ yksittä: yksi+Num+Pl+Abe
+Pl+Abe:%>i%>ttä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Abl:%>i%>ltä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+All:%>i%>le  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+Ade+Err/Orth:%>i%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
!+Pl+All+Err/Orth:%>i%>lle  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ela:%>i%>stä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL        ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_L
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>le  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_LL
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>lle  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural back strong
!!€ kaksina: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kaksine: kaksi+Num+Pl+Com
+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Com:%>i%>ne        NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_NN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural back strong
!!€ kaksina: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ kaksine: kaksi+Num+Pl+Com
+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nnä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Com:%>i%>nne        NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ; ! Pituusreekeli on voimassa myös komitatiivissa

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural front strong
!!€ yksinä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ yksine: yksi+Num+Pl+Com
+Pl+Ess:^Por%>i%>na   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Com:^Por%>i%>ne   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_NN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural front strong
!!€ yksinä: yksi+Num+Pl+Ess
!!€ yksine: yksi+Num+Pl+Com
+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nna   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Com:%>i%>nne   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;  ! Pituusreekeli on voimassa myös komitatiivissa



! allomorphs
LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive a
!!€ kahđeksee: kahđeksen+Num+Sg+Par !eight
+Sg+Par:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_E
+Sg+Par:%>e      NUM_BACK_POSS_OPT      ;

!LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive a poss aan
!!€ kolmee: kolme+Num+Sg+Par !three
!+Sg+Par:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive ta
!!€ kuutta: kuusi+Num+Sg+Par !six
+Sg+Par:%>ta     NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive tä
!!€ viittä: viisi+Num+Sg+Par !five
+Sg+Par:%>tä     NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;


LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_E
+Sg+Par:%>e      NUM_FRONT_POSS_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative an
!!€ kahđeksheen: kahđeksen+Num+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>an     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative en back
!!€ kolmheen: kolme+Num+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>he%>en    #     ;
+Sg+Ill:%>he%>e     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative en front
!!€ viitheen: viisi+Num+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>he%>en    #     ;
+Sg+Ill:%>he%>e     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative in back
!!€ miljardhiin: miljardi+Num+Sg+Ill !billion
+Sg+Ill:%>in     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>i      NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II_Sg
+Sg+Par:%>i%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN_Sg
+Sg+Ill:%>hi%>in    #     ;
+Sg+Ill:%>hi%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

!LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural partitive ia
!!€ kaksii: kaksi+Num+Pl+Par
!+Pl+Par:%>i%>a    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II
+Pl+Par:%>i%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_III
+Pl+Par:%>i%>i%>t%>a    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_OI
+Pl+Par:%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;


LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II
+Pl+Par:%>i%>i    NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_III
+Pl+Par:%>i%>i%>t%>ä    NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;


LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural partitive ja
!!€ miljardii: miljardi+Num+Pl+Par
+Pl+Par:%>j%>a     NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ien back
!!€ kaksiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Gen
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>in   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;


LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IIN
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>in   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>i    NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IITTEN
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>itten   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>i    NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IITTEN
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>itten   #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>i    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

!LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN
!+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en    #     ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

!LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN
!+Pl+Gen:%>i%>n    #     ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ten back
!!€ kuussiin: kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen
!!€ kuutten: kuusi+Num+Pl+Gen !kuussiin on tärkeämpi
+Pl+Gen:%>ten    #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>te     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ten front
!!€ viissiin: viisi+Num+Pl+Gen 
!!€ viitten: viisi+Num+Pl+Gen !viissiin on tärkeämpi
+Pl+Gen:%>ten    #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>te     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive in back
+Pl+Gen:%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive in front
+Pl+Gen:%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural illaive ihin bavk
!!€ miljardhiin: miljardi+Num+Pl+Ill
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin   #    ;
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;
